Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TWIN CITIES R!SE; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Twin Cities R!SE to increase the capacity of their Empowerment Institute through personal empowerment training, employer partnerships, and implementation of the youth personal empowerment curriculum throughout the state. This is a onetime appropriation and funds are available until June 30, 2028. new text end